Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH

SUBTITLE A. HOSPITAL DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 1116. WOOD COUNTY CENTRAL HOSPITAL DISTRICT

OF WOOD COUNTY, TEXAS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 1116.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of directors of the district.

(2) "Director" means a member of the board.

(3) "District" means the Wood County Central Hospital District of Wood County, Texas.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.002. AUTHORITY FOR CREATION. The Wood County Central Hospital District of Wood County, Texas, is created under the authority of Section 9, Article IX, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.003. DISTRICT TERRITORY. Unless the district's boundaries are expanded under Subchapter G or H or other law, the district is composed of the territory in the boundaries of the Quitman Independent School District located in Wood County as those boundaries existed on May 25, 1967.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.004. DISTRICT SUPPORT AND MAINTENANCE NOT STATE OBLIGATION. The support and maintenance of the district's hospital system and any indebtedness incurred by the district under this chapter may not become a charge against or obligation of this state.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.005. RESTRICTION ON STATE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE. The legislature may not make a direct appropriation for the construction, maintenance, or improvement of a district facility.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER B. DISTRICT ADMINISTRATION

Sec. 1116.051. BOARD ELECTION; TERM. (a) The board consists of six directors elected from the district at large unless the boundaries of the district are expanded under Subchapter G or H.

(b) Directors serve staggered two-year terms unless:

(1) the alternate terms provided by Section 1116.307, 1116.353, or 1116.354 apply; or

(2) four-year terms are established under Section 285.081, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.052. QUALIFICATIONS FOR OFFICE. To qualify for election to the board, a person must:

(1) be at least 18 years of age;

(2) have been a resident of the district for at least two years; and

(3) be a qualified voter of the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.053. BOND; RECORD OF BOND AND OATH OF OFFICE. (a) Each director shall qualify for office by executing a good and sufficient commercial bond for $1,000 that is:

(1) payable to the district; and

(2) conditioned on the faithful performance of the director's duties.

(b) The district shall pay for a director's bond.

(c) Each director's bond and constitutional oath of office shall be deposited with the district's depository for safekeeping.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.054. BOARD VACANCY. If a vacancy occurs on the board, the board shall appoint a director for the unexpired term.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.055. OFFICERS. The board shall elect from among its members a president, a secretary, and a treasurer at the first meeting after each directors' election.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.056. COMPENSATION; EXPENSES. A director is not entitled to compensation but is entitled to reimbursement for any necessary expense incurred in the performance of official duties.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.057. DISTRICT ADMINISTRATOR. (a) The board may employ a district administrator to manage the operations of the hospital system.

(b) The district administrator may employ necessary personnel to perform the services provided by the hospital system.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.058. EMPLOYEES. The board may employ an attorney, a general manager, a bookkeeper, an architect, and other employees necessary for the efficient operation of the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.059. MAINTENANCE OF RECORDS; PUBLIC INSPECTION. Except as provided by Section 1116.053, the board shall:

(1) maintain all district records, including books, accounts, notices, minutes, and other matters of the district and the district's operation, at the district office; and

(2) make those records available for public inspection at reasonable times.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 1116.101. DISTRICT RESPONSIBILITY. The district shall provide all necessary medical and hospital care for the district's needy inhabitants.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.102. RESTRICTION ON POLITICAL SUBDIVISION TAXATION AND DEBT. A political subdivision of this state, other than the district, may not impose a tax or issue bonds or other obligations to provide hospital service or medical care in the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.103. MANAGEMENT AND CONTROL OF DISTRICT. The board has full power to manage and control the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.104. HOSPITAL SYSTEM. The district has the responsibility to establish a hospital or hospital system within its boundaries to provide hospital and medical care to the district's residents.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.105. RULES. (a) The board shall adopt rules for the efficient operation of the district and district facilities.

(b) The board shall:

(1) publish the rules in book form; and

(2) provide copies to interested persons on request at district expense.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.106. PURCHASING AND ACCOUNTING. The board may prescribe the method of making purchases and expenditures and the manner of accounting and control used by the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.107. EMINENT DOMAIN. (a) The district may exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire a fee simple or other interest in real, personal, or mixed property located in district territory if the interest is necessary or convenient to exercise a power or duty conferred on the district by this chapter.

(b) The district must exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by Chapter 21, Property Code, except that the district is not required to deposit in the trial court money or a bond as otherwise required by Section 21.021(a), Property Code.

(c) In a condemnation proceeding, the district is not required to:

(1) pay in advance or provide a bond or other security for costs in the trial court; or

(2) provide a bond for costs or a supersedeas bond on an appeal or petition for review.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.108. GIFTS AND ENDOWMENTS. The board may accept for the district a gift or endowment to be held in trust and administered by the board under the directions, limitations, or other provisions prescribed in writing by the donor that are not inconsistent with the proper management of the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.109. CONTRACTS WITH POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS FOR HOSPITAL CARE. The board may contract with a political subdivision to provide hospital and medical care for needy persons who reside outside the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.110. PAYMENT FOR TREATMENT; PROCEDURES. (a) A person who resides in the district is entitled to receive necessary medical and hospital care regardless of whether the person has the ability to pay for the care. The person may apply to receive this care without cost.

(b) The board or the district administrator shall employ a person to investigate the ability of the patient and any relative liable for the patient's support to pay for the medical and hospital care received by the patient.

(c) If the investigator finds that neither the patient nor those relatives can pay all or part of the patient's care, the expense of this care becomes a charge against the district.

(d) If the patient or those relatives can pay for all or part of the costs of the patient's care, the board shall order the patient or relative to pay to the district treasurer each week an amount specified in the order. The amount must be proportionate to the person's ability to pay.

(e) The district may collect the amount from the patient's estate, or from any relative liable for the patient's support, in the manner provided by law for the collection of expenses of the last illness of a deceased person.

(f) If there is a dispute as to the ability to pay, or doubt in the mind of the investigator, the board shall hold a hearing and, after calling witnesses, shall:

(1) determine the question; and

(2) make the proper order based on the board's findings.

(g) A party to the hearing who is not satisfied with the result of the order may appeal to the district court. The appeal is de novo, as that term is used in an appeal from a justice court to a county court.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER D. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 1116.151. BUDGET. The board shall prepare a budget that includes:

(1) proposed expenditures and disbursements;

(2) estimated receipts and collections for the next fiscal year; and

(3) the amount of taxes required to be imposed during the next fiscal year to meet the proposed budget.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.152. PROPOSED BUDGET: NOTICE AND HEARING. (a) The board shall hold a public hearing on the proposed budget.

(b) Notice of the hearing must be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the district not later than the 10th day before the date of the hearing.

(c) Any qualified property tax paying voter is entitled to:

(1) appear at the hearing; and

(2) be heard regarding any item in the proposed budget.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.153. FISCAL YEAR. The district's fiscal year is from October 1 to September 30.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.154. ANNUAL AUDIT. (a) The board annually shall require an independent audit of the district's books and records.

(b) Not later than December 1 of each year, the board shall file a copy of the audit with:

(1) the comptroller; and

(2) the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.155. DEPOSITORY. (a) The board by resolution shall designate a bank in Wood County as the district's depository. A designated bank serves for two years and until a successor is designated.

(b) All district money shall be deposited in the depository and secured in the manner provided for securing county funds.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER E. BONDS

Sec. 1116.201. BONDS. (a) The district may issue bonds to:

(1) purchase, construct, acquire, repair, or renovate buildings and improvements; and

(2) equip buildings for hospital purposes.

(b) The total face value of the bonds may not exceed the amount specified in the election order.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.202. TAX TO PAY BONDS. The board may issue bonds under Section 1116.201 only if the board imposes an ad valorem tax at a rate sufficient to create an interest and sinking fund to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds as the bonds mature.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.203. BOND ELECTION. (a) The board may issue bonds under Section 1116.201 only if the bonds are authorized by a majority of the district voters voting in an election held for that purpose.

(b) The board may order a bond election at any time.

(c) The order calling an election must include:

(1) the time of the election;

(2) the location of the polling places;

(3) the form of the ballots;

(4) the presiding judge for each polling place;

(5) the purpose of the bond issuance;

(6) the amount of the bonds to be issued;

(7) the maximum interest rate of the bonds; and

(8) the maximum maturity date of the bonds.

(d) A substantial copy of the election order shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the district once a week for two consecutive weeks before the date of the election. The first notice must be published at least 14 days before the date of the election.

(e) A copy of the election results must be filed with the county clerk and become a public record.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.204. MATURITY OF BONDS. District bonds must mature not later than 40 years after the date of issuance.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.205. EXECUTION OF BONDS. The board president shall execute the district's bonds in the district's name, and the board secretary shall countersign the bonds.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER F. TAXES

Sec. 1116.251. IMPOSITION OF AD VALOREM TAX. (a) The board shall impose a tax on all property in the district subject to district taxation.

(b) The tax may be used only to:

(1) pay the interest on and create a sinking fund for bonds issued under this chapter;

(2) provide for the operation and maintenance of the district and the hospital system;

(3) make improvements and additions to the hospital system; and

(4) acquire sites for additions to the hospital system.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.252. TAX RATE. Unless the tax rate is increased as provided by Section 1116.253, the board may impose the tax at a rate not to exceed 35 cents on each $100 valuation of all property in the district subject to taxation.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.253. ELECTION TO INCREASE MAXIMUM TAX RATE; ORDER; NOTICE; BALLOT. (a) The board may order an election to increase the district's maximum tax rate to a rate not to exceed 75 cents on each $100 valuation of all property in the district subject to district taxation.

(b) The maximum tax rate may not be increased unless the increase is approved by a majority of the district voters voting in an election held for that purpose.

(c) The board shall give notice of the election in the manner provided for a bond election under Section 1116.203.

(d) The election order must provide for clerks as in county elections and must state:

(1) the date of the election;

(2) the location of the polling places;

(3) the form of the ballot; and

(4) the presiding judge and alternate judge for each polling place.

(e) The ballot for an election shall be printed to permit voting for or against the proposition: "The imposition of a tax not to exceed 75 cents on the $100 valuation on all property in the district subject to hospital district taxation."

(f) The board shall declare the results of the election.

(g) An election to increase the maximum tax rate may not be held under this section before the first anniversary of the date of any preceding election on the same proposition.

(h) Section 41.001(a), Election Code, does not apply to an election ordered under this section.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.254. TAX ASSESSOR AND COLLECTOR. The Wood County tax assessor-collector shall collect taxes for the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER G. EXPANSION OF DISTRICT TERRITORY TO INCLUDE MINEOLA INDEPENDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT

Sec. 1116.301. PETITION TO EXPAND DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) Registered voters of a defined territory composed of all territory within the boundaries of the Mineola Independent School District may file a petition with the board secretary requesting inclusion of the territory in the district.

(b) The petition must be signed by the lesser of 50 registered voters of the territory or a majority of those voters.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.302. NOTICE OF HEARING. (a) The board shall set a time and place to hold a hearing on the petition.

(b) The hearing shall be held not earlier than the 31st day after the date the board issues the order.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.303. ORDER OF ANNEXATION. If, after the hearing, the board determines that annexation of the territory into the district would be feasible and would benefit the district, the board may approve the annexation by a resolution entered in its minutes.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.304. RATIFICATION ELECTION. (a) Annexation of territory is final when approved by a majority of the voters at:

(1) an election held in the district; and

(2) a separate election held on the same date in the territory to be annexed.

(b) Section 41.001(a), Election Code, does not apply to an election held under this section.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.305. ASSUMPTION OF DEBT AND TAXES. If the district has outstanding debts or taxes, the voters in the elections to approve annexation must determine whether the annexed territory will assume its portion of the debts or taxes on annexation.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.306. BALLOT. The ballot for the elections shall be printed to permit voting for or against the following, as applicable:

(1) "Adding the territory within the boundaries of the Mineola Independent School District to the Wood County Central Hospital District of Wood County."

(2) "The territory within the boundaries of the Mineola Independent School District assuming its proportionate share of the outstanding debts and taxes of the Wood County Central Hospital District of Wood County, if it is added to the district."

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.307. COMPOSITION AND ELECTION OF BOARD FOLLOWING ANNEXATION; TERMS. (a) If annexation is approved, the board shall appoint a resident of the Mineola Independent School District to serve as a temporary director until the date of the next regular election of directors.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, beginning on the date the temporary director is appointed as required by Subsection (a) and ending on the date a majority of the directors elected in the next regular election have qualified for office:

(1) the board is composed of seven directors; and

(2) a concurrence of four directors is sufficient in any matter relating to district business.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, on the date of the next regular election following the approval of annexation:

(1) five directors shall be elected from the area of the district that is composed of the jurisdiction of the Quitman Independent School District as those boundaries existed on May 25, 1967;

(2) five directors shall be elected from the area of the district that is composed of the jurisdiction of the Mineola Independent School District as those boundaries existed on the date annexation was approved; and

(3) three directors shall be elected from the district at large.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, on the date a majority of the directors elected to the board under Subsection (c) have qualified for office:

(1) the term of office of any director elected or appointed to the board before that election expires; and

(2) the directors elected to the board under Subsection (c) shall draw lots to determine:

(A) which director elected from the area of the district that is composed of the jurisdiction of the Quitman Independent School District, as those boundaries existed on May 25, 1967, serves a one-year term, which two directors elected from that area serve two-year terms, and which two directors elected from that area serve three-year terms;

(B) which director elected from the area of the district that is composed of the jurisdiction of the Mineola Independent School District, as those boundaries existed on the date annexation was approved, serves a one-year term, which two directors elected from that area serve two-year terms, and which two directors elected from that area serve three-year terms; and

(C) which director elected from the district at large serves a one-year term, which director elected from the district at large serves a two-year term, and which director elected from the district at large serves a three-year term.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, beginning on the date a majority of the directors elected under Subsection (c) qualify for office:

(1) the board is composed of 13 directors; and

(2) a concurrence of seven directors is sufficient in any matter relating to district business.

(f) Successor directors shall be elected as provided by Subsections (c) and (d) so that:

(1) five directors are elected from the area of the district that is composed of the jurisdiction of the Quitman Independent School District as those boundaries existed on May 25, 1967;

(2) five directors are elected from the area of the district that is composed of the jurisdiction of the Mineola Independent School District as those boundaries existed on the date annexation was approved; and

(3) three directors are elected from the district at large.

(g) Following each decennial federal census, the board shall evaluate the electoral areas described by Subsection (f) to ensure that the areas comply with the requirements of federal election laws and shall adjust the jurisdiction of the areas in accordance with federal requirements.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER H. EXPANSION OF DISTRICT TERRITORY TO INCLUDE ALBA-GOLDEN, YANTIS, AND HAWKINS INDEPENDENT SCHOOL DISTRICTS

Sec. 1116.351. ELECTION ON EXPANSION OF DISTRICT; ORDER; NOTICE. (a) The board may order one or more elections in the area of one or more of the following independent school districts, as they were constituted on May 15, 1979, on the question of whether that area shall be included in the district:

(1) Alba-Golden;

(2) Yantis; and

(3) Hawkins.

(b) The area of a school district in which an election is held is included in the district if a majority of registered voters in that school district voting at the election approve annexation.

(c) The board shall give notice of the election in the district and in the area of each school district sought to be included in the district in the manner provided for a bond election under Section 1116.203.

(d) The election order must provide for clerks as in county elections and must state:

(1) the date of the election;

(2) the location of the polling places;

(3) the form of the ballot; and

(4) the presiding judge and alternate judge for each polling place.

(e) The board shall declare the results of the election.

(f) An election to expand district territory to include the area of a school district may not be held under this section before the first anniversary of the date of an election on the same proposition.

(g) Section 41.001(a), Election Code, does not apply to an election ordered under this section.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.352. BALLOT. The ballot for an election shall be printed to permit voting for or against the proposition: "The inclusion of the area of the (name of district) Independent School District in the Wood County Central Hospital District; providing for the imposition of annual taxes for hospital purposes and to pay that area's share of the hospital district's debt at a rate not to exceed (maximum tax rate in the district) cents on the $100 valuation of all taxable property within the district."

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.353. COMPOSITION OF BOARD AFTER ANNEXATION OF ONE SCHOOL DISTRICT; TERMS; VOTING REQUIREMENT. (a) If a majority of the voters in the area of only one of the school districts approve annexation, the board shall appoint a resident of that area to serve as a director until the next regular election of directors.

(b) Successors to a director appointed under Subsection (a) are elected from the district at large and serve two-year terms.

(c) During any time the board is composed of seven directors, a concurrence of four is sufficient in any matter relating to district business.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1116.354. COMPOSITION OF BOARD AFTER ANNEXATION OF MORE THAN ONE SCHOOL DISTRICT; TERMS; VOTING REQUIREMENT. (a) If a majority of the voters in the area of more than one school district approve annexation, the board may appoint two directors who are residents of the annexed area to serve in addition to the six sitting directors, for a total of eight directors.

(b) If the board appoints two directors under Subsection (a), the board shall appoint:

(1) one director to serve until the next regular election of directors following appointment; and

(2) one director to serve until the election of directors following the next regular election of directors.

(c) During any time the board is composed of eight directors, a concurrence of five is sufficient in any matter relating to district business.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.